Washington statutes.
RCW 3.74.030

Mandatory retirement for district judges.

A district judge shall retire from judicial office at the expiration of the judge's term of office in which he or she has attained the age of seventy-five years. This provision shall not affect the term to which any such judge shall have been elected or appointed prior to August 11, 1969.

[ 2013 c 22 s 1; 1984 c 258 s 56; 1969 ex.s. c 6 s 1.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.